Hawaii, session 2026, HB2059.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that requiring first responders to obtain commercial driver's licenses to operate authorized commercial vehicles is not in the best interest of public safety, because first responders receive training provided by federal, state, and county government agencies that would satisfy this requirement. Imposing this requirement would only serve to create an administrative hurdle for first responders and hinder the performance of their vital public safety functions. The legislature additionally finds that although emergency medical services personnel, who may be assigned to operate vehicles that are classified as commercial motor vehicles in the performance of essential public safety functions, receive the same levels of rigorous training as others authorized to operate commercial vehicles, they are still required to obtain commercial driver's licenses, which slows down hiring, raises costs, and creates administrative hurdles for emergency medical services departments across the State. The legislature further finds that exempting qualified emergency medical services personnel from commercial driver's license requirements may help to alleviate barriers to recruitment and retention and streamline essential functions, while maintaining public safety standards. The legislature also finds that the current definition for "authorized emergency vehicle" in the Hawaii Revised Statutes is insufficient, in that it does not include alternative emergency service vehicles utilized by emergency medical services departments in the State. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Exempt emergency medical services personnel from commercial driver's license requirements, similar to other licensed first responders operating in the State; and (2)  Expand the definition of "authorized emergency vehicle" to replace ambulances with emergency medical services vehicles, and include disaster response and recovery vehicles, department of health-approved vehicles, and vehicles designated as emergency vehicles by the State or an emergency management agency. SECTION 2.  Section 286-235.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§286-235.5  Persons exempt from licensure.  The following persons shall be exempt from licensure under this part: (1)  Individuals who operate commercial motor vehicles for military purposes.  This exception is limited to active-duty military personnel, members of the military reserves, members of the national guard on active duty, including personnel on full-time national guard duty, personnel on part-time national guard training, and national guard military technicians (civilians who are required to wear military uniforms), and active-duty United States Coast Guard personnel.  This exception is not applicable to United States reserve technicians; and (2)  Federal, state, and county firefighters, emergency medical services personnel, and law enforcement officers who drive federal, state, or county fire trucks, including fire pumpers, aerial ladder trucks, and elevated platform trucks, or authorized emergency vehicles; provided that they are trained by the federal, state, or county government and the commercial motor vehicles are equipped with audible and visual signals and are not subject to normal traffic regulation[.]; provided further that federal, state, and county government agencies shall maintain proof that personnel under this paragraph have successfully completed an agency-approved or other state-approved training on authorized emergency vehicles.  For purposes of this paragraph, "authorized emergency vehicle" shall have the same meaning as in section 291C-1." SECTION 3.  Section 291C-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending the definition of "authorized emergency vehicle" to read as follows: ""Authorized emergency vehicle" includes fire department vehicles, police vehicles, [ambulances,] emergency medical services vehicles, disaster response and recovery vehicles, ocean safety vehicles, law enforcement vehicles, conservation and resources enforcement vehicles, [and] office of the state fire marshal vehicles, and department of health vehicles authorized and approved pursuant to section 291-31.5 that are publicly owned, and other publicly or privately owned vehicles designated as such by the state or a county council[.] or an emergency management agency." SECTION 4.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.